src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ======================
!! !!!Inflection lexica for Inari Saami verbs
! ======================

!! Order of triggers:
!! {{{
!! SV|ÁE|ÁI  EA|SC  FCD  WG|CSH  CLEN  VHIGH|VBACK  RVSH|RLEN  SLEN|SVSH  SVLOW
!! }}}


!! !!Overview

!! # Auxiliaries
!! ## NEG
!! ## LEDE
!! # 2-syllabic: 2SYLL_ etc. (classified according to infinitive suffix)
!! # 3-syllabic
!! # 4-syllabic
!! # Unclassified: verbstems, 3v, 4v

!! !The lexica

!! ''Twosyllabic lexica''

!! * 2SYLL_AASSAD - aassâđ ääss
!! ** Inf:â%>đ K ;
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH áásá,
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h ääsih, rvow like Inf,
!! ** ConNeg:â^WG rvow like Inf,
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK%>m aassim
!! * 2SYLL_MOONNAD - moonnâđ ma^RVnn
!! ** Inf:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>đ (functions also for ääss)
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH mana,
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:e^CSH%>h maneh, rvow like Sg3
!! ** ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN rvow like Inf
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1:i^VHIGH^RLEN%>m moonnim
!! * 2SYLL_TOOLLAD - toollâđ,  tuáll
!! ** Inf:â^VBACK%>đ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálá, á^CSH
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h tuálih, rvow like Sg3
!! ** ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN rvow like Sg3
!! ** Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK^RLEN%>m toollim
!! * 2SYLL_TOOHAD - toohâđ, ta^RVh^RC
!! ** Inf: = 2SYLL_MOONNAD
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH taha,
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:e^CSH%>h taheh, rvow like Sg3
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i  juuvâi
!! ** ConNeg: rvow like Inf = 2SYLL_MOONNAD
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: toohim = 2SYLL_MOONNAD
!! * 2SYLL_VIISSAD - viiššâđ, vi^RVšš
!! ** Inf:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>đ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH višá,
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:e^CSH^RVSH%>h, rvow like Sg3 višeh
!! ** ConNeg:â^WG^RLEN viišâ, rvow like Inf
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1:i^RLEN%>m viiššim
!! * 2SYLL_KIESSAD - kiessâđ, kiess
!! ** Inf:â%>đ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH kiäsá,
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h kiesih
!! ** ConNeg:â^WG rvow like Inf kiesâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>m  kiessim
!! * 2SYLL_VUOLLAD - vuollâđ, vuoll OBS: not Prs+Pl3 vowel like the others
!! ** Inf:â%>đ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH vuálá,
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h  vyelih
!! ** ConNeg:â^WG rvow like Inf vuolâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>m vuollim
!! * 2SYLL_ETTAD ettâđ e^RVtt4
!! ** Inf:â^VHIGH%>đ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH  iätá
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3:e^CSH%>h
!! ** ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>m
!! * 2SYLL_KALGAD kalgâđ
!! ** Inf:
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3:  kálgá
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: kälgih
!! ** ConNeg: kaalgâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: kalgim
!! * 2SYLL_KAVNAD  as ETTAD but with VBACK kavnâđ kä^RVvn
!! ** Inf:
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: kávná
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: kävnih
!! ** ConNeg: kaavnâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: kavnim
!! * 2SYLL_COGGAD kolgâđ ka^RVlg
!! ** Inf:
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalga
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalgeh
!! ** ConNeg: koolgâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolgim
!! * 2SYLL_KULGAD kulgâđ ko^RVlg
!! ** Inf:
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgá
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: kolgeh
!! ** ConNeg: kuulgâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: kulgim
!! * 2SYLL_OPPAD oppâđ uápp
!! ** Inf:
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáppá
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáppih
!! ** ConNeg: oopâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: oppim
!! * 2SYLL_SODDAD šoddâđ ša^RVdd
!! ** Inf:
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: šadda
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: šaddeh
!! ** ConNeg: šoodâ
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: šoddim
!! * 2SYLL_POHTED pohteđ:po5^RVht
!! ** poovtám RLEN
!! ** pohtá
!! ** pohteh
!! ** povte
!! * 2SYLL_PIHTED pihteđ pi^RVht
!! ** pivtám
!! ** pihtá
!! ** pihteh
!! ** pivte
!! * 2SYLL_KALVED kalveđ ka^RVlv
!! ** kalvam
!! ** kalva
!! ** kalveh
!! ** kalve
!! * 2SYLL_JOTTEED
!! * 2SYLL_ID celkkiđ
!! * 2SYLL_KASTID
!! * 2SYLL_EELLID: iälám iälá eelih ij ele
!! * 2SYLL_KEESSID
!! * 2SYLL_CAALLID
!! * 2SYLL_PAACCID pääcciđ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg1: páásám
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: páácá
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: pääcih NB! pääccih?
!! * 2SYLL_UADDID
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg1: čálám
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáálá
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: čäälih NB! čäällih?
!! * 2SYLL_TIETTID
!! * 2SYLL_UADDID
!! * 2SYLL_VYEIJID
!! * 2SYLL_VYELGID like VYEIJID, but -i for reduced forms
!! * JUAVVID

!! * 2SYLL_OD
!! * 2SYLL_OOD
!! ** Prt+Du1 njivvoim WG CLEN
!! * 2SYLL_ORROOD  like 2SYLL_OOD, but different triggers here and there
!! ** Prt+Du1 oroim WG

!! * 2SYLL_UD
!! ** Inf: ruábbuđ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruábbu
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruábbuh
!! ** ConNeg: ruábu
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruábbum
!! * 2SYLL_KUARRUD  long dipht => -o
!! ** Inf: kuárruđ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáru
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuáruh
!! ** ConNeg: kuáru, kuáro
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: koorrum
!! * 2SYLL_UAZZUD
!! ** Inf: uážžuđ
!! ** Ind+Prs+Sg3: uážžu
!! ** Ind+Prs+Pl3: uážžuh
!! ** ConNeg: uážu
!! ** Ind+Prt+Sg1: ožžum

!! !Threesyllabic
!! * 3_LEKKASID (no stem change, but going to ODDLEX)
!! ** Sg1: %>âm, Sg3: ^CLEN^RLEN (note: ODDLEX :-(
!! * 3_CIELATTID (stem-final tt shortening) cielâttiđ: cielât Length change in stem: Consonant change only
!! ** Sg1: %>âm, Sg3: ^CLEN^RLEN
!! * 3_VYEJETTID (2syll vow short in Inf, long in Sg3, 1st syll V lengthening) vyejettiđ vyejeet
!! ** Sg1: %>âm, Sg3: ^RLEN^SLEN
!! * 3_PUTESTID (cns and vow lengthening) putestiđ: putteest Length change in stem: Short V in Inf (before V)
!! ** Sg1: %>âm, Sg3: ^CLEN^SLEN
!! * 3_COKKIITTID (stem-final tt shortening + 2syll vow shortening cokkiittiđ cokkit.
!! ** Sg1: %>âm, Sg3: ^SVSH
!! ** difference in negation + Action Ess, Loc.. compared to 3_COKKIITTID)
!! ** Length change in stem: Long V in Inf (before C#).
!! * 3_KUIKETTID = 3_LEKKASID
!! * 3_MERIDID
!! ** Sg1: %>âm, Sg3: ^CLEN^RLEN
!! * 3_ADELID
!! ** Sg1: %>âm, Sg3: ^CLEN

!! !4-syllabic
!! * 4v
!! * 4_ADELISTID
!! * 4_KAVNATTATTAD
!! * 4_TUHHID

!! !Contracted
!! * Contracted j-stems
!! ** C_COKKAD (áj-contracted)
!! *** Ind Prs Pl3 čokkájeh
!! ** C_PALLAD (aj-contracted)
!! ** C_TUHHID (ej-contracted)
!! ** C_RAMMUD (oj-contracted)
!! * Contracted v-stems
!! ** C_TABAHTUD (Sg3 -uvá)
!! ** C_MERIDUD (Sg3 uvvoo)

!! Unclassified verbs
!! * verbstem (no info)

!! A note on morphophonology
!! The consonant gradation setup for verbs is to a certain extent different
!! from the one for nouns, namely:
!! ...



!! !!!THE LEXICA THEMSELVES


!! !!Auxiliaries

LEXICON NEG !!= * __@CODE@__ = the negation verb
+Ind+Sg1:jiem G ; ! jiemge, *jiemgin, jiemba
+Ind+Sg2:jieh G ; ! etc. 
+Ind+Sg3:ij # ;  !
+Ind+Du1:iän G ;
+Ind+Du2:eppee G ;
+Ind+Du3:iävá G ;
+Ind+Pl1:ep G ; 
+Ind+Pl2:eppeđ G ;
+Ind+Pl3:iä G ;
+Ind+Sg3+Foc/go:ij%>#go # ;  !
+Ind+Sg3+Foc/ge:i%>#ge # ;
+Ind+Sg3+Foc/ge+Use/NG:ij%>#ge # ;
+Ind+Sg3+Foc/han:ij%>#hân # ;
+Ind+Pl3+Foc/ge:iä%>#ge # ;
+Ind+Sg1+Foc/ge+Use/NG:e%>#ge # ; ! This either with or without pe-nu tag.
+Ind+Sg2+Foc/ge+Use/NG:e%>#ge # ; ! 
+Ind+Sg3+Foc/ge+Use/NG:e%>#ge # ;
+Ind+Pl1+Foc/ge+Use/NG:e%>#ge # ;
+Ind+Pl2+Foc/ge+Use/NG:e%>#ge # ;
+Ind+Pl3+Foc/ge+Use/NG:e%>#ge # ;
+Ind+Sg3+Foc/uv:ij%>#%-uv # ;  !
+Ind+Sg3+Foc/ba:ij%>#ba # ;  !

+Imprt+Sg1:iällum  G ;
+Imprt+Sg2:ele G ;
+Imprt+Sg3:iällus G ;
+Imprt+Du1:iälloon G ;
+Imprt+Du2:ellee G ;
+Imprt+Du3:iällus G ;
+Imprt+Pl1:iällup G ;
+Imprt+Pl2:elleđ G ;
+Imprt+Pl3:iällus G ;
+Opt+Sg2:iälu G ;
+Opt+Du2:iällu G ;
+Opt+Pl2:iälluđ G ;
+Sup:amas G ;
+Sup+Use/NG:emis G ;
